New Jersey, session 222, A4554.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  There is appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection the sum of $111,600,000 from dedicated natural resource damages revenues pursuant to Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 9 of the State Constitution in the Natural Resource Damages  Constitutional Dedication account, from funds recovered in connection with claims made by the State in the matters of N.J. Dept of Env. Protection v. Atlantic Richfield Co., et al., No. 08 CIV 00312 (S.D.N.Y.); N.J. Dept of Env. Protection v. Exxon Mobil Corporation, No. GLO-L-000297-19 (a/k/a Exxon Lail); N.J. Dept of Env. Protection v. Bank of America, N.A., No. 23-2598 (D.N.J) (a/k/a White Swan Cleaners); N.J Dept of Env. Protection v. Handy & Harman, et al; Kinder Morgan, Inc., and Its Related Entities; The Estate of Ralph F. Brass; Michael A. Tramontana (a/k/a Eton Dry Cleaners); N.J Dept of Env. Protection v. Carbide-Graphite Group, Inc., et al., No. MID-L-5793-07 (a/k/a Sayreville Landfill); N.J. Dept. of Env. Protection v. Solvay Specialty Polymers USA, LLC, and Arkema, Inc. No. GLO-L-001239-20, The Ciba Geigy Toms River Superfund Site, and The American Cyanamid Superfund Site, for projects to repair, restore, or replace damaged or lost natural resources of the State, or permanently protect the natural resources of the State pursuant to the prioritization set forth in Article VIII, Section II, paragraph 9 of the State Constitution as follows: RESTORATION/ACQUISITION $102,400,000 Habitat Restoration and Enhancement/ Land Acquisition Statewide $33,500,000 Habitat Restoration and Enhancement/ Land Acquisition in the Lower Delaware Water Region $54,455,000 Habitat Restoration and Enhancement/ Land Acquisition in the Atlantic Water Region $2,250,000 Habitat Restoration and Enhancement/ Land Acquisition in the Northeast Water Region $10,250,000 Habitat Restoration and Enhancement in the Raritan Water Region $1,345,000 Restoration Oversight  Ciba-Geigy Superfund Site $500,000 Restoration Oversight  Headgates Dam Removal $100,000 ADMINISTRATION $9,200,000 b.  The department may reallocate funds among the projects appropriated hereinabove, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting in the Department of the Treasury.  The department shall send written notification of any such reallocation of funds to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the General Assembly, the Legislative Budget and Finance Officer, the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor, and the Chairs of the Senate Environment and Energy Committee and Assembly Environment, Natural Resources, and Solid Waste Committee, or their respective successor committees. c.  Moneys appropriated hereinabove are appropriated for State costs, including, but not limited to, grants or loans to local governments, and grants or loans to nonprofit organizations, as determined by the department. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.